hunspell/spanish.aff
SFX V		 ar		 ad		pegar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		pelambrar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		pelear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		pellar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		penar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		peñar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		pensar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		perar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		perchar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		pernar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		personalizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		picar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		pidar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		pillar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		pimpollar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		pipar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		pitar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		planar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		plar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		plicar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		plomar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		plorar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		podar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		pollar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ponear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		popar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		porizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		posar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		postar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		precintar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		preocupar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		presentar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		probar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ptar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		puntar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		purrear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		putar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		quear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		quetear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		quilar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		quillar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		quinar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		quistar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rabear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ractar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ragar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rajar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ralizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ramar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rañar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ranzar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rasar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ratar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ravar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rbar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rbotear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rcar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rchar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rchear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rdar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rdinar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		recentar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		redar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		relacionar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rellenar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		remangar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		remar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		remiar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		renar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rendar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rentar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		resar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rescar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		resembrar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		restar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		retar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rezar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rgar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rializar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		riar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ridar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rificar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rilar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rillar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rimar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rinar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ringar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		riorizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		riquear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		riscar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ritar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		riturar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rlar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rmar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rmentar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rnar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rnear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		roar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		robar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		roborar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rochar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rogar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rojar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rolar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rolear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		romar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ronar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		roñar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ronear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rotar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rotear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rrajar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rrar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rrear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rriar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rrinar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rrogar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rronar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rrotar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rrotear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rrugar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rtar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rugar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rullar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rumar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		rutar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ruzar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		samar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		sanar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		sanear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		sar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		saturar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		scar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		scarar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		scordar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		scular
SFX V		 ar		 ad		sear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		sentar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		sgar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		siar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		sificar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		sillar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		similar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		sionar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		smear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		solar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		soldar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		sonar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		sortijar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		spar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		spear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		spirar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		squillar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		star
SFX V		 ar		 ad		staurar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		stear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		stiar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		sticar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		stificar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		stilar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		stillar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		strar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		surar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tablar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		talar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		talizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tallar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		taminar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tañar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tanear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tatar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tecar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		techar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		telar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		temperar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tenciar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tensar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		terar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		terificar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		terminar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ternar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ternizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		terrar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		testar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tiar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tibar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ticar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ticiar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ticular
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tificar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tigar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tijar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tilizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tillar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tillear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tinar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tirar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tivar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tocar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tografiar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tojar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		toñar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tonear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		torar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		torear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		torizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tractar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tranquilizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		trar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tratar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		trechar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		trenar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		trinar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		trojar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		trucar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tualizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tuar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tular
SFX V		 ar		 ad		turar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		turbar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tusar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		tutear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ualizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		uar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ucar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		uchar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ucidar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		udar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		udicar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		uear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		uecar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		uejar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		uelar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ufar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ufragar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ugar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		uinar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ujar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ular
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ularizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ullar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ultar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		umar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		umbrar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		unar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		uñar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		undar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		untar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		upar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		uplicar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		uquear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		urar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		urrar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		usar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		uscar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		usionar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		usmear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ustrar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		utar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		uzar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		valar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		var
SFX V		 ar		 ad		vedar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		vendar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ventar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		ventear
SFX V		 ar		 ad		viar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		vinar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		vocar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		vorizar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		xidar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		xiliar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		yar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		zar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		zgar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		zonar
SFX V		 ar		 ad		zumar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		abañar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		abear
SFX V		 ar		 áis		abonar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		abrar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		abucar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		abular
SFX V		 ar		 áis		abundar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		acanar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		acar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		accionar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		acear
SFX V		 ar		 áis		aceitar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		acerar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		achacar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		achar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		aciar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		acionar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		acotar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		acrar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		actar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		adear
SFX V		 ar		 áis		adeudar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		adornar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		adrar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		adrillar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		adronar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		afagar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		afiar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		afinar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		agar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		agraviar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		agrupar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		aguar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		aguazar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		aguear
SFX V		 ar		 áis		ahondar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		aizar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		ajar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		ajear
SFX V		 ar		 áis		alabear
SFX V		 ar		 áis		alabrar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		alar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		alariar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		alayar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		aldar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		aldear
SFX V		 ar		 áis		aldonar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		alear
SFX V		 ar		 áis		alificar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		alizar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		allar
SFX V		 ar		 áis		almar
