hunspell/spanish.dic
abandeer/V
abastionar/V
abitar/V
abogar/V
abotonar/V
abrumar/V
abstuver/V
acaballonar/V
acanalar/V
acarrar/V
aceituñar/V
achabacañar/V
aciacer/V
acodar/V
acomedir/V
acordar/V
acotar/V
acrodextrinar/V
acudir/V
adecuar/V
adjudicar/V
adorar/V
adular/V
aerotrenar/V
afistular/V
agachar/V
agobiar/V
agremiar/V
aguadar/V
aguijonear/V
ahitar/V
aimar/V
ajuarar/V
alampar/V
alechugar/V
algarrar/V
allegar/V
alquilar/V
amancillar/V
amestizar/V
amorronar/V
anañar/V
aniler/V
anteverar/V
aogir/V
aparvar/V
apipar/V
apopastar/V
apruebir/V
arácñer/V
arpar/V
arrequesonar/V
arroyar/V
aseglarizar/V
aspaventar/V
atairar/V
atenacear/V
atollar/V
aunar/V
avaluar/V
azafear/V
bacaladillar/V
baldosar/V
barbear/V
basquear/V
befabemiar/V
bibliotecar/V
biohrmir/V
blastocelar/V
bonsar/V
branquiomar/V
brucir/V
buscavir/V
caccer/V
calcar/V
cambalachar/V
cangreñar/V
captar/V
carear/V
casar/V
catequistar/V
cedir/V
centiplicar/V
cestar/V
chapalear/V
chibolar/V
chochecer/V
cigomaticoorbitar/V
circunnavegar/V
climatizar/V
cocarar/V
cojear/V
columnar/V
comparter/V
comprer/V
concomerar/V
confinar/V
conmensurar/V
consumar/V
contradecer/V
contrapuntar/V
conver/V
corcovarar/V
corretear/V
craniañar/V
cromosominar/V
cuantificar/V
cuñetar/V
cutiar/V
decamparar/V
deficitar/V
demar/V
deplorar/V
desabrigar/V
desafortunar/V
desamistar/V
desapropiar/V
desatacar/V
desbastecer/V
descañonar/V
desciender/V
descomprimirar/V
descosir/V
desdar/V
desempanar/V
desencolar/V
desenjaular/V
desenzarcir/V
desgüacer/V
deshojar/V
deslechuguillar/V
desmantelar/V
desmovilizar/V
despanchurrar/V
desperdigar/V
despolvar/V
desriñonar/V
destorcer/V
desvastigar/V
deteriorar/V
diademar/V
difluirir/V
dirigir/V
disgeusir/V
distrajar/V
domesticar/V
dulcificar/V
electrohidráulicar/V
emballenar/V
embermejzar/V
embravezar/V
empadronar/V
empenar/V
emponchar/V
enangostar/V
encandilar/V
encauchar/V
encir/V
encordelar/V
encurtir/V
enfatuar/V
engalguar/V
engrasar/V
enjbar/V
enmarar/V
enredir/V
ensalzar/V
ensopar/V
entoldar/V
entrepechugar/V
entruchr/V
enverjar/V
equiparar/V
escalabrar/V
escarpar/V
escotopiar/V
esgrimir/V
espeluznar/V
esquinar/V
esterar/V
estratagemar/V
eternizar/V
excisar/V
expedentar/V
extender/V
extremistar/V
familiarizar/V
febrífugar/V
fijar/V
flamear/V
fondear/V
fracasar/V
fricar/V
fulminar/V
galleter/V
garrafar/V
generalizar/V
glicerir/V
gorgorotar/V
gravar/V
guadameciar/V
guinchar/V
hamadrir/V
hemimetábolar/V
hibernizar/V
hiper/V
hontanar/V
huevarar/V
idiotizar/V
impermeabilizar/V
imputar/V
incomunicar/V
indir/V
infrautilizar/V
inmersar/V
inser/V
interceptar/V
intifar/V
inventariar/V
isobatir/V
jaqocar/V
joulir/V
kronprizar/V
lambelibranquir/V
larguear/V
lechigar/V
lewisitar/V
limonar/V
lividecir/V
longanizar/V
macasar/V
magnificar/V
malgastar/V
mancar/V
manumitiesar/V
marrajar/V
mayorazgar/V
memar/V
mesoapendizar/V
midar/V
mirrar/V
molasar/V
monovalvularar/V
mostrar/V
mujeregar/V
musicar/V
ándir/V
ninfear/V
notar/V
oblar/V
octogenar/V
olvidir/V
orentir/V
ovularar/V
palear/V
panificar/V
paraselenar/V
parusir/V
patriarcar/V
pedigrear/V
pentir/V
periponer/V
personificar/V
picardar/V
pintar/V
piunar/V
platinar/V
poetisar/V
poner/V
posear/V
preanomar/V
predelincuenciar/V
preludir/V
presumir/V
problematizar/V
prolificar/V
prosternar/V
pudentar/V
purpurear/V
quimerizar/V
raciocinar/V
rareficer/V
reactivar/V
rebeldir/V
recapitular/V
recochinear/V
reconstituyérar/V
rectificar/V
reductasar/V
reformar/V
regiar/V
reinar/V
relevar/V
remojar/V
renover/V
repir/V
rerer/V
resinificar/V
resuellar/V
retransmitiesar/V
revelar/V
rezumar/V
rivalizar/V
romper/V
ruinar/V
sacar/V
salificar/V
sancionar/V
satiñir/V
segundar/V
senegalir/V
sesar/V
siguir/V
sitar/V
sobreescribir/V
societar/V
soltar/V
sospechar/V
submandibular/V
subvenir/V
sumer/V
suroestar/V
tablazar/V
tapar/V
tascar/V
temeronar/V
terquear/V
tinar/V
tolondronar/V
trabucar/V
transcribir/V
tranzonar/V
trasmigrar/V
trasverter/V
tribuyar/V
trmir/V
tufarar/V
tutear/V
ungüentar/V
utopistar/V
vaporizar/V
ventanar/V
vertebrar/V
viguar/V
vivar/V
wenler/V
zahonar/V
zoar/V
